tables/ko-2020-context.cti
always 나아 14-126-126
always 나악 14-126-126-1
always 나앆 14-126-126-1-1
always 나앇 14-126-126-1-3
always 나안 14-126-126-25
always 나앉 14-126-126-25-13
always 나않 14-126-126-25-356
always 나앋 14-126-126-35
always 나알 14-126-126-2
always 나앍 14-126-126-2-1
always 나앎 14-126-126-2-26
always 나앏 14-126-126-2-12
always 나앐 14-126-126-2-3
always 나앑 14-126-126-2-236
always 나앒 14-126-126-2-256
always 나앓 14-126-126-2-356
always 나암 14-126-126-26
always 나압 14-126-126-12
always 나앖 14-126-126-12-3
always 나앗 14-126-126-3
always 나았 14-126-126-34
always 나앙 14-126-126-2356
always 나앚 14-126-126-13
always 나앛 14-126-126-23
always 나앜 14-126-126-235
always 나앝 14-126-126-236
always 나앞 14-126-126-256
always 나앟 14-126-126-356
always 나애 14-126-1235
always 나액 14-126-1235-1
always 나앢 14-126-1235-1-1
always 나앣 14-126-1235-1-3
always 나앤 14-126-1235-25
always 나앥 14-126-1235-25-13
always 나앦 14-126-1235-25-356
always 나앧 14-126-1235-35
always 나앨 14-126-1235-2
always 나앩 14-126-1235-2-1
always 나앪 14-126-1235-2-26
always 나앫 14-126-1235-2-12
always 나앬 14-126-1235-2-3
always 나앭 14-126-1235-2-236
always 나앮 14-126-1235-2-256
always 나앯 14-126-1235-2-356
always 나앰 14-126-1235-26
always 나앱 14-126-1235-12
always 나앲 14-126-1235-12-3
always 나앳 14-126-1235-3
always 나앴 14-126-1235-34
always 나앵 14-126-1235-2356
always 나앶 14-126-1235-13
always 나앷 14-126-1235-23
always 나앸 14-126-1235-235
always 나앹 14-126-1235-236
always 나앺 14-126-1235-256
always 나앻 14-126-1235-356
always 나야 14-126-345
always 나약 14-126-345-1
always 나앾 14-126-345-1-1
always 나앿 14-126-345-1-3
always 나얀 14-126-345-25
always 나얁 14-126-345-25-13
always 나얂 14-126-345-25-356
always 나얃 14-126-345-35
always 나얄 14-126-345-2
always 나얅 14-126-345-2-1
always 나얆 14-126-345-2-26
always 나얇 14-126-345-2-12
always 나얈 14-126-345-2-3
always 나얉 14-126-345-2-236
always 나얊 14-126-345-2-256
always 나얋 14-126-345-2-356
always 나얌 14-126-345-26
always 나얍 14-126-345-12
always 나얎 14-126-345-12-3
always 나얏 14-126-345-3
always 나얐 14-126-345-34
always 나양 14-126-345-2356
always 나얒 14-126-345-13
always 나얓 14-126-345-23
always 나얔 14-126-345-235
always 나얕 14-126-345-236
always 나얖 14-126-345-256
always 나얗 14-126-345-356
always 나얘 14-126-345-1235
always 나얙 14-126-345-1235-1
always 나얚 14-126-345-1235-1-1
always 나얛 14-126-345-1235-1-3
always 나얜 14-126-345-1235-25
always 나얝 14-126-345-1235-25-13
always 나얞 14-126-345-1235-25-356
always 나얟 14-126-345-1235-35
always 나얠 14-126-345-1235-2
always 나얡 14-126-345-1235-2-1
always 나얢 14-126-345-1235-2-26
always 나얣 14-126-345-1235-2-12
always 나얤 14-126-345-1235-2-3
always 나얥 14-126-345-1235-2-236
always 나얦 14-126-345-1235-2-256
always 나얧 14-126-345-1235-2-356
always 나얨 14-126-345-1235-26
always 나얩 14-126-345-1235-12
always 나얪 14-126-345-1235-12-3
always 나얫 14-126-345-1235-3
always 나얬 14-126-345-1235-34
always 나얭 14-126-345-1235-2356
always 나얮 14-126-345-1235-13
always 나얯 14-126-345-1235-23
always 나얰 14-126-345-1235-235
always 나얱 14-126-345-1235-236
always 나얲 14-126-345-1235-256
always 나얳 14-126-345-1235-356
always 나어 14-126-234
always 나억 14-126-1456
always 나얶 14-126-1456-1
always 나얷 14-126-1456-3
always 나언 14-126-23456
always 나얹 14-126-23456-13
always 나얺 14-126-23456-356
always 나얻 14-126-234-35
always 나얼 14-126-2345
always 나얽 14-126-2345-1
always 나얾 14-126-2345-26
always 나얿 14-126-2345-12
always 나엀 14-126-2345-3
always 나엁 14-126-2345-236
always 나엂 14-126-2345-256
always 나엃 14-126-2345-356
always 나엄 14-126-234-26
always 나업 14-126-234-12
always 나없 14-126-234-12-3
always 나엇 14-126-234-3
always 나었 14-126-234-34
always 나엉 14-126-234-2356
always 나엊 14-126-234-13
always 나엋 14-126-234-23
always 나엌 14-126-234-235
always 나엍 14-126-234-236
always 나엎 14-126-234-256
always 나엏 14-126-234-356
always 나에 14-126-1345
always 나엑 14-126-1345-1
always 나엒 14-126-1345-1-1
always 나엓 14-126-1345-1-3
always 나엔 14-126-1345-25
always 나엕 14-126-1345-25-13
always 나엖 14-126-1345-25-356
always 나엗 14-126-1345-35
always 나엘 14-126-1345-2
always 나엙 14-126-1345-2-1
always 나엚 14-126-1345-2-26
always 나엛 14-126-1345-2-12
always 나엜 14-126-1345-2-3
always 나엝 14-126-1345-2-236
always 나엞 14-126-1345-2-256
always 나엟 14-126-1345-2-356
always 나엠 14-126-1345-26
always 나엡 14-126-1345-12
always 나엢 14-126-1345-12-3
always 나엣 14-126-1345-3
always 나엤 14-126-1345-34
always 나엥 14-126-1345-2356
always 나엦 14-126-1345-13
always 나엧 14-126-1345-23
always 나엨 14-126-1345-235
always 나엩 14-126-1345-236
always 나엪 14-126-1345-256
always 나엫 14-126-1345-356
always 나여 14-126-156
always 나역 14-126-156-1
always 나엮 14-126-156-1-1
always 나엯 14-126-156-1-3
always 나연 14-126-16
always 나엱 14-126-16-13
always 나엲 14-126-16-356
always 나엳 14-126-156-35
always 나열 14-126-1256
always 나엵 14-126-1256-1
always 나엶 14-126-1256-26
always 나엷 14-126-1256-12
always 나엸 14-126-1256-3
always 나엹 14-126-1256-236
always 나엺 14-126-1256-256
always 나엻 14-126-1256-356
always 나염 14-126-156-26
always 나엽 14-126-156-12
always 나엾 14-126-156-12-3
always 나엿 14-126-156-3
always 나였 14-126-156-34
always 나영 14-126-12456
always 나옂 14-126-156-13
always 나옃 14-126-156-23
always 나옄 14-126-156-235
always 나옅 14-126-156-236
always 나옆 14-126-156-256
always 나옇 14-126-156-356
always 나예 14-126-36-34
always 나옉 14-126-36-34-1
always 나옊 14-126-36-34-1-1
always 나옋 14-126-36-34-1-3
always 나옌 14-126-36-34-25
always 나옍 14-126-36-34-25-13
always 나옎 14-126-36-34-25-356
always 나옏 14-126-36-34-35
always 나옐 14-126-36-34-2
always 나옑 14-126-36-34-2-1
always 나옒 14-126-36-34-2-26
always 나옓 14-126-36-34-2-12
always 나옔 14-126-36-34-2-3
always 나옕 14-126-36-34-2-236
always 나옖 14-126-36-34-2-256
always 나옗 14-126-36-34-2-356
always 나옘 14-126-36-34-26
always 나옙 14-126-36-34-12
always 나옚 14-126-36-34-12-3
always 나옛 14-126-36-34-3
always 나옜 14-126-36-34-34
always 나옝 14-126-36-34-2356
always 나옞 14-126-36-34-13
always 나옟 14-126-36-34-23
always 나옠 14-126-36-34-235
always 나옡 14-126-36-34-236
always 나옢 14-126-36-34-256
always 나옣 14-126-36-34-356
always 나오 14-126-136
always 나옥 14-126-1346
always 나옦 14-126-1346-1
always 나옧 14-126-1346-3
always 나온 14-126-12356
always 나옩 14-126-12356-13
always 나옪 14-126-12356-356
always 나옫 14-126-136-35
always 나올 14-126-136-2
always 나옭 14-126-136-2-1
always 나옮 14-126-136-2-26
always 나옯 14-126-136-2-12
always 나옰 14-126-136-2-3
always 나옱 14-126-136-2-236
always 나옲 14-126-136-2-256
always 나옳 14-126-136-2-356
always 나옴 14-126-136-26
always 나옵 14-126-136-12
always 나옶 14-126-136-12-3
always 나옷 14-126-136-3
always 나옸 14-126-136-34
always 나옹 14-126-123456
always 나옺 14-126-136-13
always 나옻 14-126-136-23
always 나옼 14-126-136-235
always 나옽 14-126-136-236
always 나옾 14-126-136-256
always 나옿 14-126-136-356
always 나와 14-126-1236
always 나왁 14-126-1236-1
always 나왂 14-126-1236-1-1
always 나왃 14-126-1236-1-3
always 나완 14-126-1236-25
always 나왅 14-126-1236-25-13
always 나왆 14-126-1236-25-356
always 나왇 14-126-1236-35
always 나왈 14-126-1236-2
always 나왉 14-126-1236-2-1
always 나왊 14-126-1236-2-26
always 나왋 14-126-1236-2-12
always 나왌 14-126-1236-2-3
always 나왍 14-126-1236-2-236
always 나왎 14-126-1236-2-256
always 나왏 14-126-1236-2-356
always 나왐 14-126-1236-26
always 나왑 14-126-1236-12
always 나왒 14-126-1236-12-3
always 나왓 14-126-1236-3
always 나왔 14-126-1236-34
always 나왕 14-126-1236-2356
always 나왖 14-126-1236-13
always 나왗 14-126-1236-23
always 나왘 14-126-1236-235
always 나왙 14-126-1236-236
always 나왚 14-126-1236-256
always 나왛 14-126-1236-356
always 나왜 14-126-1236-1235
always 나왝 14-126-1236-1235-1
always 나왞 14-126-1236-1235-1-1
always 나왟 14-126-1236-1235-1-3
always 나왠 14-126-1236-1235-25
always 나왡 14-126-1236-1235-25-13
always 나왢 14-126-1236-1235-25-356
always 나왣 14-126-1236-1235-35
always 나왤 14-126-1236-1235-2
always 나왥 14-126-1236-1235-2-1
always 나왦 14-126-1236-1235-2-26
always 나왧 14-126-1236-1235-2-12
always 나왨 14-126-1236-1235-2-3
always 나왩 14-126-1236-1235-2-236
always 나왪 14-126-1236-1235-2-256
always 나왫 14-126-1236-1235-2-356
always 나왬 14-126-1236-1235-26
always 나왭 14-126-1236-1235-12
always 나왮 14-126-1236-1235-12-3
always 나왯 14-126-1236-1235-3
always 나왰 14-126-1236-1235-34
always 나왱 14-126-1236-1235-2356
always 나왲 14-126-1236-1235-13
always 나왳 14-126-1236-1235-23
always 나왴 14-126-1236-1235-235
always 나왵 14-126-1236-1235-236
always 나왶 14-126-1236-1235-256
always 나왷 14-126-1236-1235-356
always 나외 14-126-13456
always 나왹 14-126-13456-1
always 나왺 14-126-13456-1-1
always 나왻 14-126-13456-1-3
always 나왼 14-126-13456-25
always 나왽 14-126-13456-25-13
always 나왾 14-126-13456-25-356
always 나왿 14-126-13456-35
always 나욀 14-126-13456-2
always 나욁 14-126-13456-2-1
always 나욂 14-126-13456-2-26
always 나욃 14-126-13456-2-12
always 나욄 14-126-13456-2-3
always 나욅 14-126-13456-2-236
always 나욆 14-126-13456-2-256
always 나욇 14-126-13456-2-356
always 나욈 14-126-13456-26
always 나욉 14-126-13456-12
always 나욊 14-126-13456-12-3
always 나욋 14-126-13456-3
always 나욌 14-126-13456-34
always 나욍 14-126-13456-2356
always 나욎 14-126-13456-13
always 나욏 14-126-13456-23
always 나욐 14-126-13456-235
always 나욑 14-126-13456-236
always 나욒 14-126-13456-256
always 나욓 14-126-13456-356
always 나요 14-126-346
always 나욕 14-126-346-1
always 나욖 14-126-346-1-1
always 나욗 14-126-346-1-3
always 나욘 14-126-346-25
always 나욙 14-126-346-25-13
always 나욚 14-126-346-25-356
always 나욛 14-126-346-35
always 나욜 14-126-346-2
always 나욝 14-126-346-2-1
always 나욞 14-126-346-2-26
always 나욟 14-126-346-2-12
always 나욠 14-126-346-2-3
always 나욡 14-126-346-2-236
always 나욢 14-126-346-2-256
always 나욣 14-126-346-2-356
always 나욤 14-126-346-26
always 나욥 14-126-346-12
always 나욦 14-126-346-12-3
always 나욧 14-126-346-3
always 나욨 14-126-346-34
always 나용 14-126-346-2356
always 나욪 14-126-346-13
always 나욫 14-126-346-23
always 나욬 14-126-346-235
always 나욭 14-126-346-236
always 나욮 14-126-346-256
always 나욯 14-126-346-356
always 나우 14-126-134
always 나욱 14-126-134-1
always 나욲 14-126-134-1-1
always 나욳 14-126-134-1-3
always 나운 14-126-1245
always 나욵 14-126-1245-13
always 나욶 14-126-1245-356
always 나욷 14-126-134-35
always 나울 14-126-12346
always 나욹 14-126-12346-1
always 나욺 14-126-12346-26
always 나욻 14-126-12346-12
always 나욼 14-126-12346-3
always 나욽 14-126-12346-236
always 나욾 14-126-12346-256
always 나욿 14-126-12346-356
always 나움 14-126-134-26
always 나웁 14-126-134-12
always 나웂 14-126-134-12-3
always 나웃 14-126-134-3
always 나웄 14-126-134-34
always 나웅 14-126-134-2356
always 나웆 14-126-134-13
always 나웇 14-126-134-23
always 나웈 14-126-134-235
always 나웉 14-126-134-236
always 나웊 14-126-134-256
always 나웋 14-126-134-356
always 나워 14-126-1234
always 나웍 14-126-1234-1
always 나웎 14-126-1234-1-1
always 나웏 14-126-1234-1-3
always 나원 14-126-1234-25
always 나웑 14-126-1234-25-13
always 나웒 14-126-1234-25-356
always 나웓 14-126-1234-35
always 나월 14-126-1234-2
always 나웕 14-126-1234-2-1
always 나웖 14-126-1234-2-26
always 나웗 14-126-1234-2-12
always 나웘 14-126-1234-2-3
always 나웙 14-126-1234-2-236
always 나웚 14-126-1234-2-256
always 나웛 14-126-1234-2-356
always 나웜 14-126-1234-26
always 나웝 14-126-1234-12
always 나웞 14-126-1234-12-3
always 나웟 14-126-1234-3
always 나웠 14-126-1234-34
always 나웡 14-126-1234-2356
always 나웢 14-126-1234-13
always 나웣 14-126-1234-23
always 나웤 14-126-1234-235
always 나웥 14-126-1234-236
always 나웦 14-126-1234-256
always 나웧 14-126-1234-356
always 나웨 14-126-1234-1235
always 나웩 14-126-1234-1235-1
always 나웪 14-126-1234-1235-1-1
always 나웫 14-126-1234-1235-1-3
always 나웬 14-126-1234-1235-25
always 나웭 14-126-1234-1235-25-13
always 나웮 14-126-1234-1235-25-356
always 나웯 14-126-1234-1235-35
always 나웰 14-126-1234-1235-2
always 나웱 14-126-1234-1235-2-1
always 나웲 14-126-1234-1235-2-26
always 나웳 14-126-1234-1235-2-12
always 나웴 14-126-1234-1235-2-3
always 나웵 14-126-1234-1235-2-236
always 나웶 14-126-1234-1235-2-256
always 나웷 14-126-1234-1235-2-356
always 나웸 14-126-1234-1235-26
always 나웹 14-126-1234-1235-12
always 나웺 14-126-1234-1235-12-3
always 나웻 14-126-1234-1235-3
always 나웼 14-126-1234-1235-34
always 나웽 14-126-1234-1235-2356
always 나웾 14-126-1234-1235-13
always 나웿 14-126-1234-1235-23
always 나윀 14-126-1234-1235-235
always 나윁 14-126-1234-1235-236
always 나윂 14-126-1234-1235-256
always 나윃 14-126-1234-1235-356
always 나위 14-126-134-1235
always 나윅 14-126-134-1235-1
always 나윆 14-126-134-1235-1-1
always 나윇 14-126-134-1235-1-3
always 나윈 14-126-134-1235-25
always 나윉 14-126-134-1235-25-13
